Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2353.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Any physician or healthcare provider who prescribes,
dispenses or administers any medicine or drug for the purpose of inducing
an abortion shall provide the patient receiving such medicine or drug with
a written notice that reads:
"NOTICE TO PATIENTS HAVING MEDICATION ABORTIONS:
If you decide to take any abortion-inducing medicine or drug to end
your pregnancy, the state of Kansas wants you to be aware that you and
your family may hold the manufacturer, distributor and your physician or
healthcare provider financially accountable should you die, suffer injury,
complication or any debilitating side effects, or should the physician or
healthcare provider fail to address side effects, or should the medication
fail to work such that your pregnancy continues, resulting in an incomplete
abortion or in your being required to undergo surgical intervention.
You and your family may also hold the abortion-inducing medicine or
drug provider, the physician or healthcare provider or an agent of the
abortion-inducing medicine or drug provider, physician or healthcare
provider accountable for failing to inform you of complications.
If you experience complications and are in need of emergency care or a
hospital visit, you have the right to tell the physician or healthcare provider
treating the complications that you have had an abortion-inducing
medicine or drug. Providing this information will not result in any criminal
or civil penalty and will further help save your life."
(b) As used in this section, "abortion" and "physician" mean the same
as defined in K.S.A. 65-6701, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.